Alabama, session 2026rs, HB512.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
39 Section 1. Sections 22-27-5 and 22-27-7, Code of
40 Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
41 "§22-27-5
42 (a)(1) Fees, etc.; mutual agreements or contracts. The
43 governing body of a county commission or municipality
44 undertaking the responsibility for providing services to the
45 public under this article may establish fees, charges, and
46 rates and may collect and disburse funds within cooperating
47 areas or districts, inside or outside the corporate limits of
48 municipalities or inside or outside of county the respective
49 boundaries of the county or municipality, for the specific
50 purpose of administering this article and providing and
51 operating a solid waste program.
52 (2) Also, the county commission or public authorityA
53 governing body providing services to the public under this
54 article may enter into mutual agreements or contracts with the
55 governmentgoverning bodies of other counties, municipalities,
56 corporations, or individualswith other persons, where deemed
Page 2

corporations, or individualswith other persons, where deemed
HB512 INTRODUCED
57 to be mutually economical and feasible, to jointly or
58 individually collect, haul, and/oror dispose of solid wastes
59 generated within the cooperating area.
60 (3) All contracts or mutual agreements under this
61 article shall be subject to review by the health officer, and
62 all such contracts and agreements shall be subject to
63 cancellation upon 30 days' notice from the health officer with
64 the concurrence of the department, any time the contracts or
65 agreements faila contract or agreement fails to be in the best
66 interest of the health, safety, and welfare of the
67 citizensresidents residing in the affected area.
68 (b) Private or corporate agencies. Individuals,
69 corporations, partnerships, or other agencies engaging in the
70 collection and disposal of solid wastes are subject to this
71 article. Governing bodiesA governing body providing services
72 to the public under this article:
73 (1) mayMay assign territories orand approve or
74 disapprove disposal sites, with the concurrence of the health
75 department,;
76 (2) and shallShall establish and collect annual
77 license fees from such firmsthe persons engaging in the
78 collection and disposal of solid wastes and set rate schedules
79 if a service fee is charged.; and
80 (3) In addition to any other approvals which are
81 necessary for any contract between private or corporate
82 agencies and governmental entities for the disposal of solid
83 wastes, approval of the department shall be obtainedShall
84 obtain approval from the department to enter into a contract
Page 3

obtain approval from the department to enter into a contract
HB512 INTRODUCED
85 between a governmental entity and persons for the disposal of
86 solid waste.
87 (c)(1) Permits and bonds. Under subsection (b), no
88 license shall be granted or fee collectedA governing body
89 providing services to the public under this article may not
90 grant a license to a person engaging in the collection and
91 disposal of solid wastes or collect a service fee without
92 first obtaining a permit issued by the state or county health
93 department, renewable annually at the time licenses are due.
94 (2) AThe health department shall issue a permit shall
95 be based upon performance and may be revokedrevoke a permit
96 for cause, including failure to perform under the provisions
97 of this article and regulations adopted under authority of
98 this article.
99 (3) No license shall be granted without the posting of
100 a performance bond satisfactory to the governing bodyA
101 governing body providing services to the public under this
102 article shall not grant a license to a person engaging in the
103 collection and disposal of solid waste until the person posts
104 a satisfactory performance bond to the governing body.
105 (4) All solid waste disposal sites except those which
106 have certificates of exception shall have a permit from the
107 departmentA solid waste disposal site may not operate unless
108 it has a permit or a certificate of exception from the
109 department.
110 (d)(1) Financial assurance. No permit for
111 transportation of garbage by out-of-state transporters, for
112 disposal of such garbage in a sanitary landfill in this state,
Page 4

disposal of such garbage in a sanitary landfill in this state,
HB512 INTRODUCED
113 shall be issued unless financial assurance is posted by the
114 transporter with theThe health department shall not issue a
115 permit to an out-of-state transporter for transportation of
116 and disposal of garbage in a sanitary landfill in this state
117 unless the transporter posts financial assurance with the
118 health department.
119 (2) The financial assurance shall be in an amount not
120 less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) and
121 must guarantee that the garbage does not contain any regulated
122 hazardous waste, infectious waste, or explosive materials or
123 debris. The financial assurance shall be provided in
124 accordance with acceptable financial assurance instruments
125 whichthat include, but are not limited to, an escrow account,
126 performance bond, or letter of credit.
127 (3) The health department shall adopt rules specifying
128 the terms and conditions of financial assurance instruments,
129 as appropriate.
130 (e)(1) Nonpayment of fees, etc. Any governing body of a
131 county commission or municipality establishing fees, charges,
132 and rates pursuant to subsection (a) may adopt resolutions or
133 ordinances providing that if the fees, charges, or rates for
134 the services furnished by the governing body of the county
135 commission or municipality, or licensee of either, under this
136 chapter, shall are not be paid within 30 days after the
137 samefees, charges, or rates are assessed, the fees, charges,
138 or rates shall become due and payable,. the county commission
139 or municipality may, at At the expiration of the 30-day
140 period, the governing body of the county or municipality may
Page 5

period, the governing body of the county or municipality may
HB512 INTRODUCED
141 suspend the services or may proceed to recover the amount of
142 any delinquency with interest inbring a a civil action to
143 recover the outstanding amount, or both.
144 (2) Notwithstanding Sections 22-27-6 and 22-27-7, the
145 remedies provided by subdivision (1) shall be the exclusive
146 remedies for nonpayment of fees, charges, or rates for the
147 services furnished by the governing body of the county or
148 municipality.
149 (f) Notwithstanding subsection (a), any governing body
150 of a county or municipality that is providingprovides solid
151 waste services under this article thatand has a solid waste
152 reserve account with a balance in excess of one million
153 dollars ($1,000,000) may expend funds in excess amounts overof
154 one million dollars ($1,000,000) in the solid waste reserve
155 account for any lawful purposes in the best interest of the
156 county or municipality."
157 "§22-27-7
158 (a)(1) With regard to the collection of solid wastes,
159 the health department shall exercise such supervision over
160 equipment, methodology, and personnel in the management of
161 solid wastes as may be necessary to enforce sanitary
162 requirements,.
163 (2) and the state and county boards of The health
164 department may adopt such rules and regulations as may be
165 needed to specify methodology and procedures to meet the
166 requirements of this article.
167 (b)(1) With regard to the disposal of solid wastes, the
168 department shall exercise such regulatory control over the
Page 6

department shall exercise such regulatory control over the
HB512 INTRODUCED
169 management of solid wastes as may be necessary to enforce the
170 requirements of the department,.
171 (2) and theThe department may adopt such rules and
172 regulations as may be needednecessary to meet the requirements
173 of this article.
174 (c)(1) Any person violating any provision of this
175 article or any rule or regulation madeadopted pursuant to this
176 article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction,
177 shall be fined not less than $50.00 norfifty dollars ($50) or
178 more than $200.00,two hundred dollars ($200).
179 (2) and, if theIf a violation or failure or refusal to
180 obey or comply with such provision of this article or such
181 rulerules adopted pursuant to this article or regulation is a
182 continuing one, each day's violation shall constitute a
183 separate offense and shall be punished accordinglyaccording to
184 this article.
185 (d) Any person, firm or corporation granted an
186 exception under subsection (g) of Section 22-27-3(g) who or
187 whichthat fails to carry out and comply with the provisions of
188 the proposals embodied in the application and plan upon which
189 a certificate of exception was issued to him or itthe person
190 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished as
191 provided in this section. AnyFailure to pay the fee, rate, or
192 charge established by the governing body by any person, firm,
193 or corporation whichthat has not been issued a certificate of
194 exception under subsection (g) of Section 22-27-3(g) and which
195 utilizes the solid waste disposal system of any county or
196 municipality and which fails to pay the fee, rate or charge
Page 7

municipality and which fails to pay the fee, rate or charge
HB512 INTRODUCED
197 established by the county commission or municipal governing
198 body therefor shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be
199 punished as provided inis not a violation of this section.
200 (e) All citations to violators of this article shall be
201 served by any lawful officer or by the solid waste officer."
202 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
203 1, 2026.
Page 8